California statutes. Education Code
 shall be listed as a public agenda item for a meeting of the governing board before the motion being voted upon.

(e) Pupil members shall not be considered members of a legislative body of a local agency for purposes of the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(f) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Pupil member” means a pupil board member appointed pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) “Regular member” means a board member elected or selected pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (SB 1445)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Officers and Agents [35020. - 35046.]

35020.

The governing board of each school district shall fix and prescribe the duties to be performed by all persons in public school service in the school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35021.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any person, except a person required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code, may be permitted by the governing board of any school district to perform the duties specified in Section 44814 or 44815, or to serve as a nonteaching volunteer aide under the immediate supervision and direction of the certificated personnel of the district to perform noninstructional work which serves to assist the certificated personnel in performance of teaching and administrative responsibilities. With respect to this noninstructional work, the nonteaching volunteer aide shall serve without compensation of any type or other benefits accorded to employees of the district, except as provided in Section 3364.5 of the Labor Code.

(b) No district may abolish any of its classified positions and utilize volunteer aides, as authorized herein, in lieu of classified employees who are laid off as a result of the abolition of a position. A district shall not refuse to employ a person in a vacant classified position and use volunteer aides in lieu of filling the classified position.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to permit school districts to use volunteer aides to enhance its educational program but not to permit displacement of classified employees nor to allow districts to utilize volunteers in lieu of normal employee requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 40, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

35021.1.

A school district or county office of education may request that a local law enforcement agency conduct an automated records check of a prospective nonteaching volunteer aide in order to ascertain whether the prospective nonteaching volunteer aide has been convicted of any sex offense as defined in Section 44010. A plea or verdict of guilty, a finding of guilt by a court in a trial without jury, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere shall be deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. If the local law enforcement agency agrees to provide that automated records check, the results therefrom shall be returned to the requesting district or county office of education within 72 hours of the written request. A local law enforcement agency may charge a fee to the requesting agency not to exceed the actual expense to the law enforcement agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35021.2.

(a) When a school district or county office of education pursuant to Section 11105.3 of the Penal Code requests from the Department of Justice records involving criminal offenses committed by a prospective volunteer, the school district or county office of education may request that the Department of Justice provide subsequent arrest notification service pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall comply with a request made pursuant to this section.

(b) This section also applies to a person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting private school instruction on the elementary or high school level that requests, pursuant to Section 11105.3 of the Penal Code, records involving criminal offenses committed by a prospective volunteer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 476, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

35021.3.

(a) A school district or a county office of education may establish a registry of volunteer after school physical recreation instructors and other before and after school program volunteers.

(b) (1) To be included on a registry established pursuant to this section, a prospective registrant shall submit to a criminal background check pursuant to Section 45125. The prospective registrant shall also submit current contact information to the school district or county office maintaining the registry and shall update that information whenever the information changes.

(2) A school, school district, or county office of education may contribute funds to pay for all or part of the cost of a criminal background check required of a prospective registrant pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) A school district or county office maintaining a registry may impose other requirements on prospective registrants, including, but not limited to, certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(d) Upon approval of the person acting as the coordinator of, or overseeing, the after school activities of the school, a school under the jurisdiction of a school district or county office of education maintaining a registry may allow a volunteer registered with the school district or county office to provide instruction in physical recreation to pupils after school hours or provide other services.

(e) This section does not require a school district or county office of education to establish or maintain a registry and does not require a school to use a volunteer from a registry to provide instruction in physical recreation to pupils after school hours or provide other services.

(f) Instruction in physical recreation provided to a pupil by a volunteer pursuant to subdivision (d) shall not be counted toward satisfaction of either the physical education course requirements for graduation from high school pursuant to Section 51225.3 or the number of minutes of instruction in physical education required pursuant to Section 51210, 51222, or 51223, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

35021.5.

(a) The governing board of a school district may establish a school police reserve officer corps to supplement a police department established pursuant to Section 38000. Any person deputized by a school district as a school police reserve officer shall complete the training prescribed by Section 832.2 of the Penal Code.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to allow school districts to use volunteer school police reserve officers to the extent necessary to provide a safe and secure school environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 292, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

35022.

Every school district governing board consisting of five or more members shall, at its initial meeting and at each annual meeting, elect a president from among its members.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35023.

The governing board of each school district of every kind or class shall annually at its initial meeting select one of its members as its representative who shall have one vote for each member to be elected to the county committee provided by Article 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Chapter 1 of Part 3. The secretary or clerk of the district shall furnish the county superintendent of schools with a certificate naming the representative selected by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 183.)
-------------------------------------------

35024.

The governing board of any school district may appoint an executive committee. In the case of a governing board which has appointed a clerk, the committee shall consist of the president, the clerk, and one other member of the board. In the case of a governing board which has not appointed a clerk the committee shall consist of the president and two members of the board. The committee shall attend to the routine business of the board. Its action shall be reported to the board for ratification at its first meeting ensuing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35025.

The governing board of any school district may employ a person not a member of the board to act as secretary and bookkeeper for the board, and may delegate to such secretary the duties prescribed in paragraphs (a) and (c) of Section 35250.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35026.

The governing board of any school district employing eight or more teachers may employ a district superintendent for one or more schools and may delegate to the district superintendent any of the duties provided for in Section 35250.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35028.

A person shall not be eligible to hold a position as city superintendent, district superintendent, deputy superintendent, associate superintendent, or assistant superintendent of schools unless the person is the holder of both a valid school administration certificate and a valid teacher’s certificate, unless the person is employed as a deputy, associate, or assistant superintendent in a purely clerical capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 23.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

35029.

A local governing board may waive any credential requirement for the chief administrative officer of the school district under its jurisdiction. Any individual serving as the chief administrative officer of a school district who does not hold a credential may be required by the local governing board to pursue a program of in-service training conducted pursuant to guidelines approved by the commission.

No individual serving as the chief administrative officer of a school district shall be subject to the provisions of the merit system specified in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of Chapter 5 of Part 25 of this division or any other similar merit system.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35029.1.

Notwithstanding Section 35029, a local governing board shall not hire an individual for the position of chief administrative officer of the school district under its jurisdiction whose credential has been revoked by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing pursuant to Sections 44421 to 44427, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 135, Sec. 2.   Effective July 31, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35030.

No governing board or county superintendent of schools shall affix the title of deputy, associate or assistant superintendent to any position not defined by this code as a position requiring certification qualifications or which does not qualify under the provisions of Section 44065 as a position requiring certification qualifications; except that any such title may be assigned to the position of business manager or a related business position but such position shall not, if so designated, be deemed to be a position requiring certification qualifications nor shall the employee be deemed to be a certificated employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35031.

Any district superintendent of schools, or deputy, associate, or assistant superintendent of schools, may be elected for a term of no more than four years. The governing board of any school district, with the consent of the employee concerned, may at any time terminate, effective on the next succeeding first day of July, the term of employment of, and any contract of employment with, the superintendent of schools, or any associate, deputy, or assistant superintendent of schools of the district, and reelect or reemploy the employee, on those terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon by the board and the employee, for a new term to commence on the effective date of the termination of the existing term of employment. In the event the governing board of a school district determines the superintendent of schools of the district, or deputy, associate, or assistant superintendent of schools, or employee in the senior management of the classified service is not to be reelected or reemployed as such upon the expiration of his or her term, he or she shall be given written notice thereof by the governing board at least 45 days in advance of the expiration of his or her term. In the event the governing board of a district fails to reelect or reemploy the superintendent of schools of the district, or deputy, associate, or assistant superintendent of schools, or employee in the senior management of the classified service as such and the written notice herein provided for has not been given, he or she shall be deemed reelected for a term of the same length as the one completed, and under the same terms and conditions and with the same compensation.

The notice requirements of Section 44951 shall not apply to persons to whom this section applies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 184.5.)
-------------------------------------------

35032.

Notwithstanding Section 35031, the governing board of a school district may at any time during any school year increase the salaries of any district superintendent of schools and deputy, associate, or assistant superintendent of schools without terminating the term of employment of, and reelecting or reemploying, such employee and such increase may be effective on any date ordered by the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35033.

If a unified school district is formed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4200) of Part 3, of Division 1 of Title 1 to include all the territory of one or more elementary school districts, the governing board of the unified district may elect and reelect as district superintendent of schools of the unified district, or as deputy, associate, or assistant superintendent of schools of the unified district, for a four-year term, a person employed as district superintendent of schools of one of such elementary school districts at the time of the formation of the unified school district. The person may perform service in the position for the unified district for the term to which he is elected or reelected without possessing the certification document otherwise required if he has served continuously as district superintendent of the elementary district for at least 10 years prior to the formation of the unified district and if he is elected as district superintendent of schools of the unified district or as deputy, associate or assistant superintendent of schools of the unified district pursuant to this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35034.

(a) Where the entire area of a county is included within one unified school district or where the entire area of a county is included within one unified school district except for the portions of the county that are included in a school district that is under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools of another county, the county superintendent of schools may be employed as the superintendent of schools of the unified school district; provided he or she is the holder of a certification document authorizing him or her to perform those services. If a county superintendent of schools is employed as the superintendent of schools of a unified school district, he or she may be paid the salary, in addition to that provided by law for his office of county superintendent of schools, that he or she and the governing board of the unified school district may agree upon.

(b) Any county superintendent of schools who was employed as a district superintendent of a unified school district on or before September 20, 1963, may continue to perform those services without possessing the certification document otherwise required so long as he or she remains continuously employed or reemployed in his or her position.

(c) Where the entire area of a county is included within one unified school district except for the portions of the county that are included in a school district that is under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools of another county, the person who was county superintendent of schools at the time the unified school district was formed may be employed as the superintendent of schools of the unified school district without possessing the certification document otherwise required so long as he or she remains continuously employed or reemployed in his or her position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 185.)
-------------------------------------------

35035.

The superintendent of each school district shall, in addition to other powers and duties granted to or imposed upon him or her:

(a) Be the chief executive officer of the governing board of the school district.

(b) Except in a school district where the governing board has appointed or designated an employee other than the superintendent, or a deputy, or assistant superintendent, to prepare and submit a budget, prepare and submit to the governing board of the school district, at the time it may direct, the budget of the school district for the next ensuing school year, and revise and take other action in connection with the budget as the governing board of the school district may
 desire.

(c) Be responsible for the preparation and submission to the governing board of the school district, at the time the governing board may direct, the local control and accountability plan of the school district for the subsequent school year, and revise and take other action in connection with the local control and accountability plan as the governing board of the school district may desire.

(d) Except in a school district where the governing board has appointed or designated an employee other than the superintendent, or a deputy, or assistant superintendent, ensure that the local control and accountability plan is implemented.

(e) Subject to the approval of the governing board of the school district, assign all employees of the school district employed in positions requiring certification qualifications to
 the positions in which they are to serve. This power to assign includes the power to transfer a teacher from one school to another school at which the teacher is certificated to serve within the school district when the superintendent concludes that the transfer is in the best interest of the school district.

(f) Upon adoption by the school district board of a school district policy concerning transfers of teachers from one school to another school within the school district, have authority to transfer teachers consistent with that policy.

(g) Determine that each employee of the school district in a position requiring certification qualifications has a valid certificated document registered as required by law authorizing him or her to serve in the position to which he or she is assigned.

(h) Enter into contracts for
 and on behalf of the school district pursuant to Section 17604.

(i) Submit financial and budgetary reports to the governing board of the school district as required by Section 42130.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 72.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35036.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 35035, the superintendent of a school district may not transfer a teacher who requests to be transferred to a school offering kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is ranked in deciles 1 to 3, inclusive, on the Academic Performance Index if the principal of the school refuses to accept the transfer.

(b) The governing board of a school district may not adopt a policy or regulation, or enter into a collective bargaining agreement, that assigns, after April 15 of the school year prior to the school year in which the transfer would become effective, priority to a teacher who requests to be transferred to another school over other qualified applicants who have applied for positions requiring certification qualification at the school.

(c) The prohibitions in this section shall become operative on January 1, 2007. If the prohibitions in this section are in direct conflict with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on January 1, 2007, the prohibitions of this section shall become operative on the employees governed by that agreement upon its expiration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 518, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

35038.

In any district the governing board of which is required to elect a clerk, the superintendent of schools of the county shall appoint one of the members of the governing board to fill the office of district clerk if a clerk is not elected by the governing board on the date prescribed, or if, except as provided in Section 35039, a vacancy occurs in the position of district clerk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35039.

If the clerk of the district refuses to perform the duties prescribed in Section 35250 or by the governing board, the board may at a regular meeting dismiss him and appoint another member clerk. It shall immediately notify the superintendent of schools of the county of its action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35041.

Anything in a city, county, or city and county charter to the contrary notwithstanding, the governing board or boards of any school district may appoint an administrative adviser and fix and order paid his compensation. The duties of the administrative adviser are to render administrative advice to the superintendent of schools and to other officers and employees of the school district such other administrative duties as may be assigned by the superintendent of schools and the governing board of the district, and to assist the legal counsel of the district in the preparation and conduct of school district litigation. The employee shall have been admitted to practice law in the state, and shall not be required to have any certification qualifications.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35041.3.

(a) A governing board of a school district should, but is not required to, make every reasonable effort to appoint a selective service registrar for each high school. The selective service registrar may be an employee of the high school where he or she is appointed or a school volunteer who is 18 years of age or older. The duty of the selective service registrar is to help pupils subject to the federal Military Selective Service Act (50 U.S.C. App. 451 et seq.) enrolled in the high school register in accordance with that act.

(b) A school district should, but is not required to, make every reasonable effort to inform pupils enrolled with the district who are subject to the federal Military Selective Service Act (50 U.S.C. App. 451 et seq.) of all of the following:

(1) The importance of meeting one’s Selective Service obligations.

(2) The consequences of not registering as required under the federal Military Selective Service Act.

(3) How to register with the Selective Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 189, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

35041.5.

Anything in a city, county, or city and county charter to the contrary notwithstanding, the governing board or boards of any school district may, in lieu of appointing an administrative advisor pursuant to Section 35041, or any county board of education or any county superintendent of schools may, appoint a legal counsel and fix and order paid the counsel’s compensation as an employee or as an independent contractor. The duties of the legal counsel may include rendering legal advice to the superintendent of schools, the county board of education, and to other officers and employees of the school district or districts and other administrative duties as may be assigned by the superintendent of schools, the county board of education, and the governing board of the district or governing boards of the districts, and serving as the legal counsel of the superintendent of schools, the county board of education, and the district or districts in the preparation and conduct of school district litigation and administrative proceedings, and rendering advice in relation to school bond and tax increase measures and prepare all legal papers and forms necessary for the voting of school bonds and tax increase measures in the district or districts. The legal counsel shall have been admitted to practice law in the state, and shall not be required to have any certification qualifications. The term “legal counsel” as used herein includes a solo practitioner, partnership, or a law corporation.

The county board of education and the superintendent of schools of the same county shall appoint the same legal counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 697, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

35044.

The governing board of each school district shall provide for the payment of the traveling expenses of any representatives of the board when performing services directed by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35045.

The governing board of any school district having an average daily attendance of 10,000 or more may appoint a director of school building planning, who shall be a person qualified by training, experience and demonstrated ability to manage the building, construction and contracting business of the district. The director shall be responsible for the coordination of the building program of the district and shall advise the superintendent of schools and other employees of the district with respect to the negotiation and performance of school building construction contracts let by the governing board of the school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35046.

(a) The governing board of a school district may award consultancy contracts to retired certificated employees of the school district or of the county superintendent of schools who have been employed by the school district or by the county superintendent of schools for at least 10 years and who are at least 55 years of age.

(b) The governing board of a school district may enter into a contract with a retired certificated employee who has been employed by the school district or by the county superintendent of schools at least 10 years and who is at least 55 years of age whereby the retired employee is granted a consultancy contract with the school district, which contract is renewable on an annual basis for up to five years or until the retired employee reaches age 65, whichever comes first.

(c) Persons hired by a consultancy contract as authorized by this section are considered employees and are subject to the earnings limitation provided in Section 23919.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 355.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Governing Boards [35100. - 35401.]



  ARTICLE 1. Membership [35100. - 35107.]

35100.

Within 15 days after the action necessary for the formation of any elementary school district or high school district is completed, the county superintendent of schools shall appoint an interim governing board.

Within 15 days after the action necessary for the formation of any joint or joint union elementary school or high school district is completed, the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district shall appoint a majority of the members of an interim governing board. If the new district is in two counties, the other county superintendent shall appoint the rest of the interim governing board members within such 15-day period. If the new district is in more than two counties, the other county superintendents shall appoint the rest of the interim governing board members within such 15-day period as may be agreed upon by them. If they cannot agree within such 15-day period, the county superintendent who appointed the majority of the interim governing board members shall appoint the rest of the members.

The term of each governing board member so appointed shall expire on the April 1st following the election of the first elected governing board of the district.

If a majority of the members of the interim governing board of the school district is not appointed and qualified within such 15-day period, the county superintendent of schools having the power to appoint the interim governing board, or a majority thereof, shall assume the powers and duties belonging to the governing board until a majority of the governing board is selected and qualified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35101.

In newly formed unified school districts there shall be no interim governing board, but the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the particular district shall call an election for the purpose of choosing the first governing board of the district.

The election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in March, June, or November next succeeding the call. The first members of the governing board of the district shall take office on the day the canvass of the election is certified by the county superintendent of schools. The first meeting of the governing board shall be called by the county superintendent of schools not later than the third Monday following the election. The term of office of subsequent members of the board shall begin on April 1st following their election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

35102.

Within 20 days after the appointment or election of the interim or initial governing board of any newly formed district, the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district shall call a meeting of the board, by giving each member of the board at least 10 days’ notice of such meeting by registered mail. At the meeting the board shall appoint such officers as boards of its class are required to appoint at annual meetings pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 35140) of Chapter 2 of this division, name the district pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 35000) of Chapter 1 of this part and may conduct or transact any other business relating to the affairs of the district which can properly be conducted or transacted at a regular meeting of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35103.

In newly formed districts for which an interim governing board is appointed by the county superintendent of schools, a governing board member election shall be held:

(a) When the action necessary for the formation of a new school district is completed on or before the first of January of any odd-numbered year, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in March of such year.

(b) When the action necessary for the formation of a new school district is completed after the first of February of any year, whether even numbered or odd numbered, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in March of the next succeeding year.

The terms of the members elected at the initial election shall begin on the first day of April, and the terms of their predecessors shall expire on the 31st day of March, following the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35105.

Subject to the procedures prescribed by Section 1302.2 of the Elections Code with respect to newly formed unified school districts, the majority of members of the first elected board of any newly formed school district, the members of which majority received the highest number of votes, shall serve until the first Friday in December of the second succeeding odd-numbered year. The other members’ terms shall expire on the first Friday in December of the first succeeding odd-numbered year. All of these members shall continue in office until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 102.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

35106.

When a member of the governing board of a school district which is being reorganized and which will cease to exist takes office as a member of the initial or interim governing board of a newly formed school district, he or she shall cease to be a member of the governing board of the district being reorganized unless he or she elects to remain a member of that board. If the member does not elect to remain on the board of the district being reorganized, the county board of education shall then appoint another person who is eligible to serve on the governing board of the district being reorganized to the vacant position for the duration of the existence of the district being reorganized, but in no case for longer than 12 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35107.

(a) Any person, regardless of sex, who is 18 years of age or older, a citizen of the state, a resident of the school district, a registered voter, and who is not disqualified by the Constitution or laws of the state from holding a civil office, is eligible to be elected or appointed a member of a governing board of a school district without further qualifications. 

(b) (1) An employee of a school district may not be sworn into office as an elected or appointed member of that school district’s governing board unless and until he or she resigns as an employee. If the employee does not resign, the employment will automatically terminate upon being sworn into office.

(2) For any individual who is an employee of a school district and an elected or appointed member of that school district’s governing board prior to January 1, 1992, this subdivision shall apply when he or she is reelected or reappointed, on or after January 1, 1992, as a member of the school district’s governing board.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of a school district may adopt or the residents of the school district may propose, by initiative, a proposal to limit or repeal a limit on the number of terms a member of the governing board of the school district may serve on the governing board of the school district. Any proposal to limit the number of terms a member of the governing board of the school district may serve on the governing board of the school district shall apply prospectively only and shall not become operative unless it is submitted to the electors of the school district at a regularly scheduled election and a majority of the votes cast on the question favor the adoption of the proposal.

(d) (1) An initiative measure proposed pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be subject to the procedures set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9300) of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(2) A proposal submitted to the electors by the governing board pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be subject to the procedures set forth in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9500) of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(e) A member of the governing board of a school district shall abstain from voting on personnel matters that uniquely affect a relative of the member but may vote on collective bargaining agreements and personnel matters that affect a class of employees to which the relative belongs. For purposes of this section, “relative” means an adult who is related to the person by blood or affinity within the third degree, as determined by the common law, or an individual in an adoptive relationship within the third degree.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 879, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Common Governing Boards [35110. - 35113.]

35110.

When the membership of the governing boards of an elementary school district and a high school district is the same, and if the certificated employees in both districts have selected the same employee organization to be their exclusive representative for purposes of Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the board may adopt a resolution making the provisions of this article applicable to each district under its jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 22, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35111.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), when a governing board has adopted a resolution specified in Section 35110, the elementary school district and the high school district shall be deemed to be a single school district for all purposes, including, but not limited to, budget and personnel matters, and the governing board shall be deemed to be the governing board of a single school district.

(b) When a governing board has adopted a resolution pursuant to Section 35110, the school districts under its jurisdiction shall continue to be treated as separate school districts for purposes of computing state apportionments and allowances, and allocations of local property tax revenue.

(c) When a governing board has adopted a resolution pursuant to Section 35110, the school districts under its jurisdiction shall continue to hold title to the property of each district separately and any indebtedness for such property shall remain in the indebtedness of each separate district.

(d) When a governing board has adopted a resolution pursuant to Section 35110, the school districts under its jurisdiction shall publish annually, in a newspaper of local circulation, the general fund income and expenses of both districts. The publication documents shall indicate the amount transferred to each district pursuant to Section 35112 from the combined special reserve of both districts. The governing board shall adopt a resolution authorizing the specific transfers pursuant to Section 35112 at the time of the final budget adoption.

(e) For the purpose of Section 53892.1 of the Government Code, common governing boards, as described in Section 35110, shall be reported as one single educational entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 917, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

35112.

When a governing board has adopted a resolution pursuant to Section 35110, the school districts under its jurisdiction may transfer funds between the districts to the extent permitted by Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 22, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35113.
